Hawaii, session 2026, HB1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to part IV a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§103D-     Lei and flowers.  (a)  Pursuant to the timetable described in subsection (b), no state department or administratively attached agency shall purchase lei or flowers that contain plant material grown and harvested outside the State. (b) The timetable for implementing the purchasing restriction in subsection (a) shall be as follows: (1)  From January 1, 2030, to December 31, 2044, ten per cent of all flowers and lei purchased by state departments and administratively attached agencies shall comply with subsection (a); (2)  From January 1, 2045, to December 31, 2054, fifty per cent of all flowers and lei purchased by state departments and administratively attached agencies shall comply with subsection (a); (3)  From January 1, 2055, to December 31, 2064, seventy‑five per cent of all flowers and lei purchased by state departments and administratively attached agencies shall comply with subsection (a); and (4)  Beginning January 1, 2065, all flowers and lei purchased by state departments and administratively attached agencies shall comply with subsection (a)." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________